Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1914
Resident day, defined.

Resident day
means the calendar day in which care is provided to an individual resident
of a nursing facility or skilled nursing facility that is not reimbursed under
medicare, including the day of admission but not including the day of discharge,
unless the dates of admission and discharge occur on the same day, in which
case the resulting number of resident days is one resident day.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 14.